Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-209
Chief Water Officer; water data collection; fee.

The Chief Water Officer may conduct special projects for water data collection on behalf of other state agencies, political subdivisions, or federal agencies. Such data shall be public information. The Chief Water Officer may charge a fee to cover in whole or in part the costs of collecting, analyzing, and publishing the data and such fees shall be deposited in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund.

Laws 1983, LB 33, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-212.01;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 335.